Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,106
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-19,106 to 44-19,123 shall be known and may be cited as the Title Insurance Agent Act.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 29;

Laws 2004, LB 155, § 3.